Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.30.050

Ratification and validation—Notice.

(1) If the ratification of a defective corporate action does not require approval of the shareholders under RCW 23B.30.030(3):

(a) The corporation shall notify, promptly after the adoption of the resolution described in RCW 23B.30.030 (1) or (2), each holder of valid shares and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the adoption of that resolution by the board of directors, that the ratification of a defective corporate action has been approved by the board of directors pursuant to RCW 23B.30.030. This notice must also be given to each person who was a holder of valid shares or putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the defective corporate action, other than to those persons whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation.

(b) The notice specified in (a) of this subsection must contain or be accompanied by (i) a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030 (1) or (2), or (ii) the information required by RCW 23B.30.030 (1) (a) through (d) or (2) (a) through (c), as applicable. This notice must also include a statement that any action before a court to determine whether the ratification of the defective corporate action complied with the requirements imposed by this chapter must be brought within sixty days from the validation effective time.

(2) If the ratification of a defective corporate action requires approval of the shareholders under RCW 23B.30.030(3), and if the approval of the shareholders is to be given at a meeting:

(a) The corporation shall notify each holder of valid shares and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the record date for the meeting, of the proposed meeting of shareholders at which the ratification is to be submitted for approval in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050. This notice must also be given to each person who was a holder of valid shares or putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the defective corporate action, other than to those persons whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation; and

(b) The notice specified in (a) of this subsection must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider ratification of a defective corporate action and must contain or be accompanied by (i) a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030(1), or (ii) the information required by RCW 23B.30.030(1) (a) through (d). This notice must also include a statement that any action before a court to determine whether the ratification of the defective corporate action complied with the requirements imposed by this chapter must be brought within sixty days from the validation effective time.

(3) If the ratification of a defective corporate action requires approval of the shareholders under RCW 23B.30.030(3), and if the approval of the shareholders is to be without a meeting or a vote in accordance with RCW 23B.07.040:

(a) The corporation or the person soliciting consents shall give the notice required under RCW 23B.07.040(3)(a) and the corporation shall give the notice required under RCW 23B.07.040(3)(b) to each holder of valid shares and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the record date for the shareholder consent. These notices must also be given to each person who was a holder of valid shares or putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the defective corporate action, other than to those persons whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation; and

(b) The notices specified in (a) of this subsection must describe the ratification of the defective corporate action being approved and must contain or be accompanied by (i) a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030 (1) or (2), or (ii) the information required by RCW 23B.30.030 (1)(a) through (d) or (2)(a) through (c), as applicable. These notices must also include a statement that any action before a court to determine whether the ratification of the defective corporate action complied with the requirements imposed by this chapter must be brought within sixty days from the validation effective time.

(4) If a defective corporate action is validated in accordance with RCW 23B.30.080:

(a) The corporation shall notify, promptly after the validation, each holder of valid shares and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the validation, that the validation of a defective corporate action has taken place pursuant to RCW 23B.30.080. This notice must also be given to each person who was a holder of valid shares or putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the date of the defective corporate action, other than to those persons whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation.

(b) The notice specified in (a) of this subsection must contain or be accompanied by a copy of the information required by RCW 23B.30.080(2).

(5) Any notice required by this section may be given in any manner permitted by RCW 23B.01.410 and, for any corporation subject to the reporting requirements of section 13 or 15(d) of the securities exchange act of 1934, as amended, may be given by filing or furnishing the notice with the United States securities and exchange commission.

[ 2017 c 28 s 5.]